Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.551

Role of law enforcement.

At the request of a prosecutor or attorney general acting under RCW 26.27.541, a law enforcement officer may take any lawful action reasonably necessary to locate a child or a party and assist a prosecutor or attorney general with responsibilities under RCW 26.27.541.

[ 2001 c 65 s 316.]